Hawaii statutes.
§425-107 Partnership subject to amendment
or repeal of chapter. A partnership governed by this part is subject to
any amendment to or repeal of this chapter. [L 1999, c 284, pt of §1]

Case Notes

Partnership did not exist as a matter of law where plaintiff
and defendant did not have an agreement to share profits; a $1.5 million
release fee was interest on a loan and the loan commitment and accompanying
letter did not evince an intent by the parties to share profits inasmuch as
they lacked any language commonly utilized in partnership agreements, such as
"partnership", "partner", "profits", and did not
intimate any community of interest, or co-ownership, or sharing of profits,
tending to show the relationship of partners. 111 H. 286, 141 P.3d 459 (2006).

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next